Maryland, session 2025, HB0389.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
7–227.
(a) Except for personal property used in connection with a business, occupation,
or profession, personal property owned by an individual and located at the individual’s
place of residence is not subject to valuation or to property tax.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, personal property is not subject
to valuation or to property tax if the personal property is:
(1) owned by an individual;
(2) located at the individual’s place of residence; and
– 1 –

Ch. 122 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) used in connection with a family child care home OR LARGE FAMILY
CHILD CARE HOME that is registered under [Title 5, Subtitle 5, Part V of the Family Law
Article] TITLE 9.5, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(c) (1) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, personal property is not
subject to valuation or to property tax if:
(i) the personal property is owned by an individual and is used in
connection with a business, occupation, or profession that is located at the individual’s
principal residence; and
(ii) the sum total of the personal property, excluding vehicles exempt
under § 7–230 of this subtitle, had a total original cost of less than $20,000.
(2) If the individual attests to owning a sum total of personal property with
an original cost of less than $20,000, the Department may not:
(i) collect personal property information from the individual; or
(ii) require the individual to submit a personal property tax return.
9–213.
(a) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of a
county or of a municipal corporation may grant, by law, a property tax credit against the
county or municipal corporation property tax imposed on that portion of real property,
including any improvement, that [is substantially completed after July 1, 1987, if that
portion of the improved property] contains an area set aside and dedicated exclusively for
a day care center that is:
(1) registered as a family child care home OR LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE
HOME under Title 9.5, Subtitle 3 of the Education Article;
(2) licensed as a child care center under Title 9.5, Subtitle 4 of the
Education Article;
(3) licensed as a day care center for the elderly under Title 14, Subtitle 2 of
the Health – General Article; or
(4) licensed as a day care center for adults under Title 14, Subtitle 3 of the
Health – General Article.
(b) The amount of the annual credit may not exceed [$3,000] $10,000 or the
amount of county or municipal corporation property tax attributable to that portion of
property for which the credit was granted, whichever is less.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 122
(c) [Except as provided in] SUBJECT TO subsection (b) of this section, THE
MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE GOVERNING BODY OF a
county or municipal corporation may provide, by law, for:
(1) the amount of the property tax credit under this section;
(2) the duration of a property tax credit under this section; and
(3) any other provision necessary to carry out this section.
(d) A credit under this section may not be granted if the real property qualifies
for a credit under § 9–214 of this subtitle.
9–214.
(a) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of a
county or of a municipal corporation may grant, by law, a property tax credit against the
county or municipal corporation property tax imposed on that portion of the real property
on which an improvement is substantially completed [after July 1, 1988] if:
(1) the property is owned by a business having at least 25 employees; and
(2) the improvement contains an area set aside and dedicated exclusively
for a child care center that is:
(i) registered as a family child care home OR LARGE FAMILY
CHILD CARE HOME under Title 9.5, Subtitle 3 of the Education Article; or
(ii) licensed as a child care center under Title 9.5, Subtitle 4 of the
Education Article.
(b) THE AMOUNT OF THE ANNUAL CREDIT MAY NOT EXCEED $10,000 OR
THE AMOUNT OF COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX
ATTRIBUTABLE TO THAT PORTION OF PROPERTY FOR WHICH THE CREDIT WAS
GRANTED, WHICHEVER IS LESS.
(C) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE MAYOR AND
CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE governing body of a county or of a
municipal corporation may provide, by law, for:
(1) the amount and duration of the property tax credit under [subsection
(a) of] this section; and
– 3 –

Ch. 122 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) any other provision necessary to carry out the property tax credit under
[subsection (a) of] this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 4 –